Maryland, session 2025, HB0290.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – General Provisions
4–329.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “FINAL AUTOPSY DIAGNOSIS” MEANS THE
INTERPRETATIONS AND CONCLUSIONS OF A MEDICAL EXAMINER OR FORENSIC
PATHOLOGIST THAT ARE PART OF AN AUTOPSY REPORT.
[(a)] (B) Except for subsection [(b)(3)] (C)(3) of this section, this section does not
apply to:
(1) a nursing home as defined in § 19–1401 of the Health – General Article;
or
(2) an assisted living program as defined in § 19–1801 of the
Health – General Article.
[(b)] (C) Subject to subsection [(c)] (D) of this section, a custodian shall deny
inspection of the part of a public record that contains:
(1) medical or psychological information about an individual, other than
[an autopsy report of a medical examiner] A FINAL AUTOPSY DIAGNOSIS;
(2) personal information about an individual with, or perceived to have, a
disability as defined in § 20–701 of the State Government Article; or
(3) any report on human immunodeficiency virus or acquired
immunodeficiency syndrome submitted in accordance with Title 18 of the Health – General
Article.
[(c)] (D) A custodian shall allow the person in interest to inspect the public
record to the extent allowed under § 4–304(a) of the Health – General Article.

HOUSE BILL 290 3
Article – Health – General
5–301.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(B) “AUTOPSY REPORT” MEANS A DOCUMENT DETAILING THE MEDICAL
FINDINGS, INTERPRETATIONS, AND CONCLUSIONS OF A POSTMORTEM
EXAMINATION PERFORMED BY A MEDICAL EXAMINER OR FORENSIC PATHOLOGIST.
[(b)] (C) “Committee” means the Postmortem Examiners Advisory Committee.
(D) “FINAL AUTOPSY DIAGNOSIS” MEANS THE INTERPRETATIONS AND
CONCLUSIONS OF A MEDICAL EXAMINER OR FORENSIC PATHOLOGIST THAT ARE
PART OF AN AUTOPSY REPORT.
[(c)] (E) “Medical examiner’s case” means a death that a medical examiner is
required by law to investigate.
[(d)] (F) “Office” means the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner.
5–310.
(a) (1) The Office of the Chief Medical Examiner shall keep complete records
on each medical examiner’s case.
(2) The records shall be indexed properly and include:
(i) The name, if known, of the deceased;
(ii) The place where the body was found;
(iii) The date, cause, and manner of death; and
(iv) All other available information about the death.
(3) (I) THE OFFICE OF THE CHIEF MEDICAL EXAMINER SHALL
MAINTAIN A CHIEF MEDICAL EXAMINER INVESTIGATIVE DATABASE THAT INCLUDES
RECORDS ON EACH MEDICAL EXAMINER’S OR FORENSIC PATHOLOGIST’S CASE.
(II) EXCEPT FOR A FINAL AUTOPSY DIAGNOSIS, ELECTRONIC
DATA OR A RECORD STORED IN THE CHIEF MEDICAL EXAMINER INVESTIGATIVE
DATABASE, OR A COMPARABLE DATABASE MANAGED BY THE OFFICE FOR USE IN ANY
MEDICAL EXAMINER’S CASE, IS NOT CONSIDERED A PUBLIC RECORD AND SHALL BE

HOUSE BILL 290
EXEMPT FROM INSPECTION UNDER THE MARYLAND PUBLIC INFORMATION ACT.
(b) The original report of the medical examiner who investigates a medical
examiner’s case and the findings and conclusions of any autopsy shall be attached to the
record of the medical examiner’s case.
(c) The Chief Medical Examiner or, if the Chief Medical Examiner is absent or
cannot act, the Deputy Chief Medical Examiner or an assistant medical examiner, and each
deputy medical examiner promptly shall deliver to the State’s Attorney for the county
where the body was found a copy of each record that relates to a death for which the medical
examiner considers further investigation advisable. A State’s Attorney may obtain from the
office of a medical examiner a copy of any record or other information that the State’s
Attorney considers necessary.
(d) (1) In this subsection, “record”:
(i) Means the result of an external examination of or an autopsy on
a body; and
(ii) Does not include a statement of a witness or other individual.
(2) A record of the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner or any deputy
medical examiner, if made by the medical examiner or by anyone under the medical
examiner’s direct supervision or control, or a certified transcript of that record, is competent
evidence in any court in this State of the matters and facts contained in it.
(e) (1) The Office of the Chief Medical Examiner shall charge a reasonable fee
for reports as specified in a schedule of fees defined in the regulations of the Office of the
Chief Medical Examiner.
(2) A deputy medical examiner may keep any fee collected by the deputy
medical examiner.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.